Hawaii statutes.
§132D-4 Permissible uses of display
fireworks, articles pyrotechnic, and aerial devices. (a) Display
fireworks, articles pyrotechnic, and aerial devices may be purchased, set off,
ignited, or otherwise caused to explode in the State only if for display and
permitted in writing pursuant to sections 132D-10 and 132D-16.

(b) Display fireworks, articles pyrotechnic,
and aerial devices shall be set off, ignited, discharged, or otherwise caused
to explode within the State only from 9:00 a.m. to 9:00 p.m.; provided that the
applicable county fire chief may extend the time period for special events;
provided further that the time restriction established in this subsection shall
not apply to display fireworks, articles pyrotechnic, and aerial devices set
off, ignited, discharged, or otherwise caused to explode within the State
solely as part of a movie or television production. [L 1994, c 180, pt of §1;
am L 2000, c 233, §6; am L 2006, c 183, §5; am L 2011, c 127, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next